Washington statutes.
RCW 21.40.005

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Monetary sanction" means any moneys, including penalties, disgorgement, and interest, ordered to be paid as a result of an administrative or judicial action.

(2) "Original information" means information that is:

(a) Derived from the independent knowledge or analysis of a whistleblower;

(b) Not already known to the securities administrator or the securities division from any other source, unless the whistleblower is the original source of the information;

(c) Not exclusively derived from an allegation made in an administrative or judicial hearing, in a government report, hearing, audit, or investigation, or from the news media, unless the whistleblower is the source of the information; and

(d) Provided to the securities division for the first time after July 23, 2023.

(3) "Securities administrator" means the administrator of the securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW, designated pursuant to RCW 21.20.460.

(4) "Securities division" means the division of the department of financial institutions that administers the securities act of Washington, chapter 21.20 RCW.

(5) "Whistleblower" means an individual who, alone or jointly with others, provides the state or other law enforcement agency with information pursuant to the provisions set forth in this chapter, and the information relates to a possible violation of state or federal securities laws, including any rules or regulations thereunder, that has occurred, is ongoing, or is about to occur.

[ 2023 c 149 s 2.]